Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB64.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Employee Protection from Captive Audience Meeting Act.Section 2. Scope of act.This act relates to employee participation in meetings relating to political matters or religious matters at their place of employment.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:<--1234567891011121314151617 "Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."EMPLOY." TO ENGAGE, SUFFER OR PERMIT TO WORK."Employee." An individual employed by an employer."Employer." A person or entity, including an agent, representative or designee, that employs an employee. THE TERM INCLUDES THE COMMONWEALTH, ANY OF ITS POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS, INCLUDING A PUBLIC SCHOOL ENTITY OR SCHOOL ENTITY, AND ANY OFFICE, BOARD, COMMISSION, AGENCY, AUTHORITY, LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION OR OTHER INSTRUMENTALITY THEREOF."Interested party." An organization that monitors or is attentive to compliance with State laws relating to public or worker safety, wage and hour requirements or other labor issues."Political matter." A matter regarding an election for political office, a political party, a proposal to amend State law, a proposal to amend a regulation or a decision to join or support a political party or a political, civic, community, fraternal or labor organization."Religious matter." A matter regarding a religious belief, affiliation or practice or a decision to join or support a religious organization or association."SECRETARY." THE SECRETARY OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY OF THE COMMONWEALTH."Voluntary." Any of the following:(1) Not incentivized by a positive change in an employment condition, including a form of compensation or any other benefit of employment.(2) Not taken under threat of a negative change in an employment condition for nonattendance, including a negative performance evaluation, an adverse change in a form of 20250HB0064PN3056 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compensation or an adverse change in any other benefit of employment.Section 4. Prohibition on penalizing employees for nonparticipation in religious or political matters.An employer or an agent, representative or designee of an employer may not discharge, discipline or penalize, threaten to discharge, discipline or penalize, or take adverse employment action against an employee:(1) because the employee declines to attend or participate in an employer-sponsored meeting or declines to receive or listen to a communication from the employer or an agent, representative or designee of the employer if the purpose of the meeting or communication is to transmit the opinion of the employer about a religious matter or political matter;(2) as a means of inducing the employee to attend or participate in a meeting or receive or listen to communications specified under paragraph (1); or(3) because the employee, including a person acting on behalf of the employee, makes a good faith report, orally or in writing, of a violation or suspected violation of this section.Section 5. Civil penalties.(a) Right of action.--An employee aggrieved by a violation of section 4 may bring an action against an employer in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with section 4. The action must be brought no later than one year after the date of the alleged violation. An employee may bring an action under this section on behalf of the employee or multiple other employees similarly situated as the employee.20250HB0064PN3056 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Damages.--A court may award an employee prevailing in an action under subsection (a) appropriate relief, including injunctive relief, reinstatement of a former employment position or an equivalent position, back pay, reestablishment of employee benefits, including seniority, to which the employee would otherwise have been eligible if the violation had not occurred or any other appropriate relief as deemed necessary by the court to make the employee whole. A court shall award an employee prevailing in an action under this section reasonable attorney fees and costs. Remedies provided for in this act are not exclusive and shall be in addition to any other remedies provided for in law.SECTION 6. INVESTIGATION.(A) AUTHORIZATION.--IF THE SECRETARY RECEIVES INFORMATION INDICATING THAT THIS ACT MAY HAVE BEEN VIOLATED, THE SECRETARY MAY INVESTIGATE THE MATTER.(B) PERMITTED ACTIONS.--THE SECRETARY MAY TAKE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:(1) ENTER AND INSPECT A WORKSITE OR PLACE OF BUSINESS AT ANY REASONABLE TIME TO EXAMINE AND INSPECT RECORDS THAT RELATE TO COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ACT.(2) SUBPOENA WITNESSES, ADMINISTER OATHS, EXAMINE WITNESSES AND COPY OR COMPEL THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS, CONTRACTS AND OTHER DOCUMENTS THAT ARE NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF THIS ACT.(3) PETITION COMMONWEALTH COURT TO ENFORCE ANY SUBPOENA OR ORDER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT.Section 6 7. Administrative penalties.(A) INVESTIGATION AFTER RECEIPT OF COMPLAINT.--The department shall investigate an alleged violation of section 4 20250HB0064PN3056 - 4 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in a complaint received from an employee or interested party. The department shall develop a complaint form for the purposes of this section and post the form on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(B) TYPES OF PENALTIES AUTHORIZED.--IF, AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED THIS ACT, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, BRING AN ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION TO ASSESS A FINE OF UP TO $2,500 PER EMPLOYEE WHOSE RIGHTS UNDER THIS ACT WERE VIOLATED.(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, BRING AN ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION TO ASSESS A FINE OF UP TO $5,000 PER EMPLOYEE WHOSE RIGHTS UNDER THIS ACT WERE VIOLATED.Section 7 8. Notice requirements.Within (A) DUTY OF EMPLOYER.--NO LATER THAN 30 days after the effective date of this section, an employer shall post and maintain a notice of the rights of employees under this act where notices for employees are customarily posted by the employer.(B) DUTY OF DEPARTMENT.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE AND POST, ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, A NOTICE OF THE RIGHTS OF EMPLOYEES UNDER THIS ACT. THE DOCUMENT PRODUCED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY BE USED BY EMPLOYERS TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A).Section 8 9. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) prohibit a communication of information that the employer is required by Federal or State law to communicate;(2) limit the right of an employer or an agent, representative or designee of an employer to conduct meetings 20250HB0064PN3056 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 involving a religious matter or political matter if attendance is voluntary or to engage in a communication if the receipt or listening of the communication is voluntary;(3) limit the right of an employer or an agent, representative or designee of an employer to communicate information to an employee that is necessary for the employee to perform the employee's required job duties;(4) prohibit a requirement limited to the employer's managerial and supervisory employees;(5) prohibit an institution of higher education or an agent, representative or designee of an institution of higher education from conducting a meeting or participating in a communication with an employee of the institution of higher education concerning any coursework, symposia, research, publication or academic program at the institution of higher education; or(6) prohibit a Commonwealth or municipal agency, the General Assembly, a governing body of a municipality, a county executive or any other State or local governing entity from requiring an employee of the Commonwealth or municipal agency, General Assembly, governing body of a municipality, county executive or other State or local governing entity to attend an employer-sponsored meeting or participate in a communication with the employer for the purpose of communicating the employer's proposals to change public policy.;(7) PROHIBIT AN EMPLOYER FROM REQUIRING ITS EMPLOYEES TO TAKE ANTIDISCRIMINATION TRAINING, INCLUDING TRAINING ADDRESSING RELIGIOUS DISCRIMINATION; OR(8) PROHIBIT A LABOR ORGANIZATION FROM ACCESSING AN 20250HB0064PN3056 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 EMPLOYER'S EMPLOYEES IN THE WORKPLACE FOR PURPOSES OF DISCUSSING MATTERS, INCLUDING MEMBERSHIP IN THE LABOR ORGANIZATION, ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT.SECTION 10. THE CAPTIVE AUDIENCE MEETING ENFORCEMENT FUND.(A) ESTABLISHMENT.--THE CAPTIVE AUDIENCE MEETING ENFORCEMENT FUND IS ESTABLISHED IN THE STATE TREASURY.(B) SOURCE OF FUNDING.--ALL FINES IMPOSED AND COLLECTED UNDER SECTION 7 SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE CAPTIVE AUDIENCE MEETING ENFORCEMENT FUND.(C) USE OF FUND.--THE MONEY IN THE CAPTIVE AUDIENCE MEETING ENFORCEMENT FUND IS APPROPRIATED ON A CONTINUING BASIS TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING THIS ACT.Section 9 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0064PN3056 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415